Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-213
Municipalities; power to raise funds; use.

The governing bodies having power to appropriate money within the municipalities in this state acquiring, establishing, constructing, enlarging, improving, maintaining, equipping or operating airports and other air navigation facilities under the provisions of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502, are hereby authorized to appropriate and cause to be raised by taxation or otherwise in such municipalities, sufficient money to carry out the provisions of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 7(1), p. 160.